Tennessee, session 114, SB1610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2601(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(3) "Local government" means a county, and an incorporated city or town within
such county, with a population of:
(A) Not less than three hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred
(366,200) and not more than three hundred sixty-six thousand three hundred
(366,300), according to the 2020 or a subsequent federal census; and
(B) Not less than seventy-nine thousand eight hundred (79,800) and not
more than seventy-nine thousand nine hundred (79,900), according to the 2020
or a subsequent federal census;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1610
010775
- 1 -